Utah statutes.
32A-12-208 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful purchase or acceptance.
It is unlawful for any person, or the person's officer, manager, employee, or
agent, directly or indirectly or upon any pretense or device, to purchase,
take, or accept any alcoholic beverage or product from any other person,
except as provided by this title or the rules of the commission adopted under
this title.
